Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 4
SEWER AND WATER SYSTEMS

31-35-401. Definitions.

As used in this part 4, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Consumer" means any public or private user of water facilities or sewerage facilities or both.

"Governing body" means the body which is in charge of the municipality's water or sanitation facilities, whether or not the same is a "governing body" as defined in part 1 of article 1 of this title.

"Joint system" or "joint water and sewer system" means water facilities and sewerage facilities combined, operated, and maintained as a single public utility and income-producing project.

"Municipality" means a municipality as defined in part 1 of article 1 of this title and includes any quasi-municipal corporation formed principally to acquire, operate, and maintain water facilities or sewerage facilities or both.

"Net effective interest rate" of a proposed issue of bonds means the net interest cost of said issue divided by the sum of the products derived by multiplying the principal amount of such issue maturing on each maturity date by the number of years from the date of said proposed bonds to their respective maturities. "Net interest cost" of a proposed issue of bonds means the total amount of interest to accrue on said bonds from their date of issuance to their respective maturities plus the amount of any discount below par or less the amount of any premium above par at which said bonds are being or have been sold. In all cases the net effective interest rate and net interest cost shall be computed without regard to any option of redemption prior to the designated maturity dates of the bonds.

"Sewerage facilities" means any one or more of the various devices used in the collection, treatment, or disposition of sewage or industrial wastes of a liquid nature or storm, flood, or surface drainage waters, including all inlets; collection, drainage, or disposal lines; intercepting sewers; joint storm and sanitary sewers; sewage disposal plants; outfall sewers; all pumping, power, and other equipment and appurtenances; all extensions, improvements, remodeling, additions, and alterations thereof; and any and all rights or interests in such sewerage facilities.

"Water facilities" means any one or more works and improvements used in and as a part of the collection, treatment, or distribution of water for the beneficial uses and purposes for which the water has been or may be appropriated, including, but not limited to, uses for domestic, municipal, irrigation, power, and industrial purposes and including construction, operation, and maintenance of a system of raw and clear water and distribution storage reservoirs, deep and shallow wells, pumping, ventilating, and gauging stations, inlets, tunnels, flumes, conduits, canals, collection, transmission, and distribution lines, infiltration galleries, hydrants, meters, filtration and treatment plants and works, power plants, all pumping, power, and other equipment and appurtenances, all extensions, improvements, remodeling, additions, and alterations thereof, and any and all rights or interests in such works and improvements; but, no municipality shall construct or acquire facilities for the sale of electric energy or power, except hydroelectric energy or power for sale at wholesale only, without complying with the provisions of section 31-15-707.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1250, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(7) amended, p. 1540, § 1, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1975. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

31-35-402. Powers.

In addition to the powers which it may now have, any municipality, without any election of the qualified electors thereof, has power under this part 4:

To acquire by gift, purchase, lease, or exercise of the right of eminent domain, to construct, to reconstruct, to improve, to better, and to extend water facilities or sewerage facilities or both, wholly within or wholly without the municipality or partially within and partially without the municipality, and to acquire by gift, purchase, or the exercise of the right of eminent domain lands, easements, and rights in land in connection therewith;

To operate and maintain water facilities or sewerage facilities or both for its own use and for the use of public and private consumers and users within and without the territorial boundaries of the municipality, but no water service or sewerage service or combination of them shall be furnished in any other municipality unless the approval of such other municipality is obtained as to the territory in which the service is to be rendered;

To accept loans or grants or both from the United States under any federal law in force to aid in financing the cost of engineering, architectural, or economic investigations or studies, surveys, designs, plans, working drawings, specifications, procedures, or other action preliminary to the construction of water facilities or sewerage facilities or both;

To accept loans or grants or both from the United States under any federal law in force for the construction of necessary water facilities or sewerage facilities or both;

To enter into joint operating agreements, contracts, or arrangements with consumers concerning water facilities or sewerage facilities or both, whether acquired or constructed by the municipality or consumer, and to accept grants and contributions from consumers for the construction of water facilities or sewerage facilities or both. When determined by its governing body to be in the public interest and necessary for the protection of the public health, any municipality is authorized to enter into and perform contracts, whether long-term or short-term but in no event exceeding fifty years, with any consumer for the provision and operation by the municipality of sewerage facilities to abate or reduce the pollution of waters caused by discharges of wastes by a consumer and the payment periodically by the consumer to the municipality of amounts at least sufficient, in the determination of such governing body, to compensate the municipality for the cost of providing, including payment of principal and interest charges, if any, and of operating and maintaining the sewerage facilities serving such consumer.

To prescribe, revise, and collect in advance or otherwise, from any consumer or any owner or occupant of any real property connected therewith or receiving service therefrom, rates, fees, tolls, and charges or any combination thereof for the services furnished by, or the direct or indirect connection with, or the use of, or any commodity from such water facilities or sewerage facilities or both, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, minimum charges, charges for the availability of service, tap fees, disconnection fees, reconnection fees, and reasonable penalties for any delinquencies, including but not necessarily limited to interest on delinquencies from any date due at a rate of not exceeding one percent per month or fraction thereof, reasonable attorneys' fees, and other costs of collection without any modification, supervision, or regulation of any such rates, fees, tolls, or charges by any board, agency, bureau, commission, or official other than the governing body collecting them; and in anticipation of the collection of the revenues of such water facilities or sewerage facilities, or joint system, to issue revenue bonds to finance in whole or in part the cost of acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment, or extension of the water facilities or sewerage facilities, or both; and to issue temporary bonds until permanent bonds and any coupons appertaining thereto have been printed and exchanged for the temporary bonds;

To pledge to the punctual payment of said bonds and interest thereon all or any part of the revenues of the water facilities or sewerage facilities or both, including the revenues of improvements, betterments, or extensions thereto thereafter constructed or acquired, as well as the revenues of existing water facilities or sewerage facilities or both;

To enter into and perform contracts and agreements with other municipalities for or concerning the planning, construction, lease, or other acquisition and the financing of water facilities or sewerage facilities or both and the maintenance and operation thereof. Pursuant to any such contracts or agreements, such municipalities may obligate themselves to make payments in amounts which shall be sufficient to enable any municipality which finances such water facilities or sewerage facilities or both to meet its expenses, the interest and principal payments for its bonds, its reasonable reserves for debt service, operation and maintenance, and renewals and replacements, and the requirements of any rate covenant with respect to debt service coverage contained in any resolution, ordinance, or other security instrument. Such contracts or agreements may contain such other terms and conditions as the municipalities may determine, including but not limited to provisions whereby a municipality is obligated to pay for the output, capacity, or use of any project irrespective of whether such output, capacity, or use is produced or delivered to the municipality or whether any project contemplated by any such agreement is completed, operable, or operating, and notwithstanding suspension, interruption, interference, reduction, or curtailment of the output, use, or service of such project. Subject to local charter and state constitutional limitations, such contracts or agreements may also provide that if one or more of the municipalities default in the payment of its obligations under any such contract or agreement, the remaining municipalities which also have such agreements shall be required to accept and pay for, and shall be entitled proportionately to use or otherwise dispose of, the output, capacity, or use of the project contracted for by the defaulting municipalities. The obligations of a municipality under such contracts or agreements shall either constitute special obligations of the municipality, payable solely from the revenues and other moneys derived by the municipality from its water facilities, sewerage facilities, or both, and shall be treated as expenses of operating such facilities or, in the discretion of such municipality and subject to satisfaction of any requirements of law governing or limiting the incurrence of debt by such municipality, shall constitute a general obligation of such municipality. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 6 (3) of article XI of the state constitution, where such contract or agreement is to constitute a general obligation of such municipality and where such contract or agreement provides that the municipality shall be required to accept and pay for the output, capacity, or use of the project contracted for by a defaulting municipality, such contract or agreement shall not be entered into unless the question of incurring a general obligation for such project has been submitted to and approved at an election conducted by such municipality in accordance with the election laws applicable to such municipality. Any such municipalities so contracting may also provide in any contract or agreement for a board, commission, or such other body as they deem proper for the supervision and general management of the water facilities or sewerage facilities or both and for the operation thereof and may prescribe its powers and duties, including the power to issue revenue bonds pursuant to this part 4, and fix the compensation of the members thereof. For the purposes of this paragraph (h), "municipality" means a municipality as defined in part 1 of article 1 of this title and any other political subdivision of this state, including any entity formed pursuant to intergovernmental contract or agreement, authorized by any law of this state to acquire, operate, and maintain the facilities which are the subject of such contract or agreement.

To make all contracts, execute all instruments, and do all things necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers granted in this section, or in the performance of its covenants or duties, or in order to secure the payment of its bonds if no encumbrance, mortgage, or other pledge of property, excluding any pledged revenues, of the municipality is created thereby, and if no property, other than money, of the municipality is liable to be forfeited or taken in payment of said bonds, and if no debt on the credit of the municipality is thereby incurred in any manner for any purpose; and

To issue water or sewer or joint water and sewer refunding revenue bonds to refund, pay, or discharge all or any part of its outstanding water or sewer or joint water and sewer revenue bonds issued under this part 4 or under any other law, including any interest thereon in arrears or about to become due, or for the purpose of reducing interest costs, effecting a change in any particular year or years in the principal and interest payable thereon or in the related utility rates to be charged, effecting other economies, or modifying or eliminating restrictive contractual limitations appertaining to the issuance of additional bonds or to any municipal water facilities or sewerage facilities, or both, as provided in section 31-35-412.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1251, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(1)(j) amended, p. 508, § 3, effective April 22.

L. 86:

(1)(h) amended, p. 1064, § 1, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-402 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-403. Authorization of facilities and bonds.

The acquisition, construction, reconstruction, lease, improvement, betterment, or extension of any water facilities or sewerage facilities or both and the issuance, in anticipation of the collection of revenues of such facilities, of bonds to provide funds to pay the cost thereof may be authorized under this part 4 by action of the governing body of the municipality taken at a regular or special meeting by a vote of a majority of the members of the governing body.

The governing body, in determining such cost, may include all costs and estimated costs of the issuance of said bonds; all engineering, inspection, fiscal, and legal expenses; interest which it is estimated will accrue during the construction or other acquisition period and for a period of not exceeding one year thereafter on money borrowed or which it is estimated will be borrowed pursuant to this part 4; any discount on the sale of the bonds; costs of financial, professional, and other estimates and advice; contingencies; any administrative, operating, and other expenses of the municipality prior to and during such acquisition period and for a period of not exceeding one year thereafter, as may be determined by the governing body; all such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the financing, acquisition, improvement, equipment, and completion of any water or sewerage facilities, joint water and sewer system, or part thereof, and the placing of the same in operation; such provision or reserves for working capital, operation, maintenance, or replacement expenses or for payment or security of principal of or interest on any bonds during or after such an acquisition or improvement and equipment as the governing body may determine; and also reimbursements to the federal government or any agency, instrumentality, or corporation thereof of any moneys theretofore expended for or in connection with any such water or sewerage facilities or both.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1253, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-403 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-404. Bond provisions.

Revenue bonds issued under this part 4 shall bear interest at a rate such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of bonds does not exceed the maximum net effective interest rate authorized, payable semiannually or annually, and evidenced by one or two sets of coupons, if any, executed with the facsimile or manually executed signature of any official of the municipality; except that the first coupon appertaining to any bond may evidence interest not in excess of one year. The resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds shall specify the maximum net effective interest rate. Such bonds may be issued in one or more series, may bear such date, may mature at such time not exceeding the estimated life of the water facilities or sewerage facilities or both, to be acquired with the bond proceeds, as determined by the governing body, but in no event beyond forty years from their respective dates, may be in such denomination, may be payable in such medium of payment, at such place within or without the state, including but not limited to the office of any county treasurer in which the municipality is located wholly or in part, may carry such registration privileges, may be subject to such terms of prior redemption in advance of maturity in such order or by lot or otherwise at such time with or without a premium, may be executed in such manner, may bear such privileges for reissuance in the same or other denomination, may be so reissued, without modification of maturities and interest rates, and may be in such form, either coupon or registered, as may be provided by the governing body.

The governing body may provide for preferential security for any bonds, both principal and interest, to be issued under this part 4 to the extent deemed feasible and desirable by such governing body over any bonds that may be issued thereafter.

Said bonds may be sold at, above, or below the principal amounts thereof, but they may not be sold at a price such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of bonds exceeds the maximum net effective interest rate authorized.

Said bonds may be sold at public or private sale upon such terms and conditions as the governing body shall determine; except that, if said bonds are sold at public sale, notice of such sale shall be published once at least five days prior to such sale in a newspaper circulating in the municipality and in a financial newspaper published in either Denver, Colorado; San Francisco, California; Chicago, Illinois; or New York, New York.

Bonds may be issued with privileges for conversion or registration or both, for payment as to principal or interest or both, and where interest accruing on the bonds is not represented by interest coupons, the bonds may provide for the endorsing of payments of interest thereon; and the bonds generally shall be issued in such manner, in such form, either coupon or registered, with such recitals, terms, covenants, and conditions, and with such other details as may be provided by the governing body, except as otherwise provided in this part 4.

Subject to the payment provisions specifically provided in this part 4, said bonds, any interest coupons thereto attached, and any temporary bonds shall be fully negotiable within the meaning of and for all the purposes of article 8 of title 4, C.R.S., except as the governing body may otherwise provide; and each holder of each such security, by accepting such security, shall be conclusively deemed to have agreed that such security, except as otherwise provided, is and shall be fully negotiable within the meaning and for all purposes of article 8 of title 4, C.R.S.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governing body in any proceedings authorizing bonds under this part 4:

May provide for the initial issuance of one or more bonds, referred to in this subsection (5) as "bond", aggregating the amount of the entire issue;

May make such provision for installment payments of the principal amount of any such bond as it may consider desirable;

May provide for the making of any such bond, payable to bearer or otherwise, registrable as to principal or as to both principal and interest and, where interest accruing thereon is not represented by interest coupons, for the endorsing of payments of interest on such bond; and

May further make provision in any such proceedings for the manner and circumstances in and under which any such bond may in the future, at the request of the holder thereof, be converted into bonds of smaller denominations, which bonds of smaller denominations may in turn be either coupon bonds or bonds registrable as to principal or principal and interest, or both.

If lost or completely destroyed, any security authorized in this part 4 may be reissued in the form and tenor of the lost or destroyed security upon the owner furnishing, to the satisfaction of the governing body: Proof of ownership; proof of loss or destruction; a surety bond in twice the face amount of the security, including any unmatured coupons appertaining thereto; and payment of the cost of preparing and issuing the new security.

Any officer authorized to execute any bond, after filing with the secretary of state his manual signature certified by him under oath, may execute or cause to be executed, with a facsimile signature in lieu of his manual signature, any bond authorized in this part 4 if such a filing is not a condition of execution with a facsimile signature of any interest coupon and if at least one signature required or permitted to be placed on each such bond, excluding any interest coupon, is manually subscribed. An officer's facsimile signature has the same legal effect as his manual signature.

The clerk of the municipality may cause the seal of the municipality to be printed, engraved, stamped, or otherwise placed in facsimile on any bond. The facsimile seal has the same legal effect as the impression of the seal.

The ordinance or resolution authorizing any bonds or other instrument appertaining thereto may contain any agreement or provision customarily contained in instruments securing revenue bonds, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, covenants designated in section 31-35-407.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1253, § 1, effective July 1; (4) amended, p. 219, § 62, effective July 16.

L. 81:

(2)(c) amended, p. 1541, § 1, effective March 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-404 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-405. Signatures on bonds.

The bonds and any coupons bearing the signatures of officers in office on the date of the signing thereof shall be valid and binding obligations of the municipality, notwithstanding that before the delivery thereof and payment therefor any or all of the persons whose signatures appear thereon have ceased to be officers of the municipality issuing the same.

Any officer authorized or permitted to sign any bond or interest coupon, at the time of its execution and of the execution of a signature certificate, may adopt as and for his own facsimile signature the facsimile signature of his predecessor in office in the event that such facsimile signature appears upon the bond or coupons appertaining thereto or upon both the bond and such coupons.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1255, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-405 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-406. Tax exemption.

The bonds and the income therefrom are exempt from taxation, except inheritance, estate, and transfer taxes.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1256, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-406 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-407. Covenants in bond ordinance.

Any ordinance or resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds under this part 4 or trust indenture or other instrument appertaining thereto to finance in whole or in part the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment, or extension of water facilities or sewerage facilities or both may contain covenants as to:

The rates, fees, tolls, or charges or combination thereof to be charged for the services, facilities, and commodities of said water facilities or sewerage facilities or both, and the use and disposition thereof, including but not limited to the foreclosure of liens for and collection of delinquencies; the discontinuance of services, facilities, or commodities or use of any water system, any sewer system, or any joint system; prohibition against free service; the collection of penalties and collection costs, including disconnection and reconnection fees; and the use and disposition of any revenues of the municipality derived or to be derived from any water facilities or sewerage facilities or both;

The creation and maintenance of reserves or sinking funds and the regulation, use, and disposition thereof to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds or of operation and maintenance expenses of any water system, sewer system, or joint system or part thereof; the determination or definition of revenues from any water system, sewer system, or joint system and of the expenses of operation and maintenance of such system; and the source, custody, security, use, and disposition of any such reserves or sinking funds, including but not limited to the powers and duties of any trustee with regard thereto;

A fair and reasonable payment by the municipality to the account of said water facilities or sewerage facilities or both for the services, commodities, or facilities furnished said municipality or any of its departments by said water facilities or sewerage facilities or both;

The issuance of other or additional bonds or instruments payable from or constituting a charge against the revenue of such water facilities or sewerage facilities or both; the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds and the sources and methods thereof, the rank or priority of any bonds as to any lien or security for payment, or the acceleration of any maturity of any bonds, or the issuance of other or additional bonds payable from or constituting a charge against or lien upon any revenues pledged for the payment of bonds and the creation of future liens and encumbrances thereagainst and limitations thereon; and the purpose to which the proceeds of the sale of bonds may be applied and the custody, security, use, expenditure, application, and disposition thereof;

Books of account, the inspection and audit thereof, and other records appertaining to a water system, sewer system, or joint system; the insurance to be carried by the municipality and use and disposition of insurance moneys; the acquisition of completion or surety bonds appertaining to any project, funds, or personnel and the use and disposition of any proceeds of such bonds; the assumption or payment or discharge of any indebtedness, other obligation, lien, or other claim relating to any part of a water system, sewer system, or joint system, or any securities having or which may have a lien on any part of any revenues of such system; and limitations on the powers of the municipality to acquire or operate or permit the acquisition or operation of any plants, structures, facilities, or properties which may compete or tend to compete with the water system, sewer system, or joint system;

The rights, liabilities, powers, and duties arising upon the breach by the municipality of any covenants, conditions, or obligations; defining events of default; the payment of costs or expenses incident to the enforcement of the bonds or of the provisions of the ordinance or resolution authorizing the bonds or any trust indenture or other instrument appertaining thereto or of any covenant or contract with the holders of the bonds; the procedure, if any, by which the terms of any covenant or contract with or duty to the holders of bonds, the bond ordinance or resolution, or any trust indenture or other instrument may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds the holders of which, or any trustee, must consent to, and the manner in which such consent may be given or evidenced; and the terms and conditions upon which any or all of the bonds shall become or may be declared due before maturity and as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived;

The terms and conditions upon which the holders of the bonds or any portion or percentage of them may enforce any covenants or provisions made under this part 4 or duties imposed thereby; and

All such acts and things as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to secure its bonds or, in the discretion of the governing body of the municipality, tend to make the bonds more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenant, act, or thing may not be enumerated in this part 4, it being the intention of this part 4 to give a municipality power to do all things in the issuance of bonds and for their security consistent with continued public ownership of the sewerage facilities or water facilities or both.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1256, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-407 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-408. No municipal liability on bonds.

Revenue bonds issued under this part 4 shall not constitute an indebtedness of the municipality within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitations. Each bond issued under this part 4 shall recite in substance that said bond, including interest thereon, is payable solely from the revenues pledged to the payment thereof and that said bond does not constitute a debt of the municipality within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitations.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1257, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-408 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-409. Remedies of bondholders.

Subject to any contractual limitations binding upon the holders of any issue of bonds or the trustee therefor, including but not limited to the restriction of the exercise of any remedy to a specified proportion or percentage of such holders, any holder of bonds or trustee therefor has the right and power, for the equal benefit and protection of all holders of bonds similarly situated:

To enforce his rights against the municipality and its governing body and any of its officers, agents, and employees by an action in the nature of mandamus or other suit, action, or proceeding at law or in equity and to require and compel such municipalities or such governing body or any such officers, agents, or employees to perform and carry out their duties and obligations under this part 4 and their covenants and agreements with the bondholders;

To require the municipality and the governing body thereof to account as if they were the trustee of an express trust by action or suit in equity;

To enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful or in violation of the rights of the bondholders by action or suit in equity; and

To bring suit upon the bonds.

No right or remedy conferred by this part 4 upon any holder of bonds or any trustee therefor is intended to be exclusive of any other right or remedy, but each such right or remedy is cumulative and in addition to every other right or remedy and may be exercised without exhausting and without regard to any other remedy conferred by this part 4 or by any other law.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1257, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-409 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-410. Construction of part 4.

The powers conferred by this part 4 are in addition and supplemental to and not in substitution for, and the limitations imposed by this part 4 shall not affect, the powers conferred by any other law. Bonds may be issued under this part 4 without regard to the provisions of any other law. The water facilities or sewerage facilities or both may be acquired, purchased, constructed, reconstructed, improved, bettered, and extended, and bonds may be issued under this part 4 for said purposes, notwithstanding that any law may provide for the acquisition, purchase, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment, and extension for like purposes, and without regard to the requirements, restrictions, debt, or other limitations or other provisions contained in any other law, including, but not limited to, any requirement for any restriction or limitation on the incurring of indebtedness or the issuance of bonds. Insofar as the provisions of this part 4 are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of this part 4 shall be controlling.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1258, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-410 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-411. Pledge of other utility revenues.

Any municipality having surplus and unpledged revenues of any municipal utility has the power to pledge such revenues for and deposit them in the fund created to pay the interest on and principal of revenue bonds issued pursuant to this part 4.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1258, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-411 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-412. Refunding bonds.

Any bonds issued for any refunding purpose authorized in section 31-35-402 (1)(j) may either be delivered in exchange for the outstanding bonds authorized to be refunded or may be sold as provided for in section 31-35-404.

No bonds may be refunded under this part 4 unless they either mature or are callable for prior redemption under their terms within fifteen years from the date of issuance of the refunding bonds or unless the holders thereof voluntarily surrender them for exchange or payment. The final maturity of the bonds refunded may not be extended over fifteen years. The rates of interest on such refunding bonds shall be determined by the governing body. The principal amount of the refunding bonds may exceed the principal amount of the refunded bonds by such amount or amounts as are useful to effect the refunding if the aggregate principal and interest costs of the refunding bonds for the period ending on the scheduled final maturity date of the bonds refunded, without regard to any redemptions that may be made prior to such scheduled maturity date, do not exceed such unaccrued costs of the bonds refunded for the same time period, excluding from the computation of the aggregate principal and interest cost of the refunding bonds the amount of the principal of any refunding bonds issued to pay any interest in arrears or about to become due on the bonds refunded and to pay any interest on the refunding bonds.

The proceeds of refunding bonds shall either be immediately applied to the retirement of the bonds to be refunded or be placed in escrow to be applied to the payment of the bonds upon their presentation therefor. Any escrowed proceeds, pending such use, may be invested or reinvested in securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S. Such escrowed proceeds and investments, together with any interest to be derived from any such investment, shall be in an amount at all times sufficient to pay the bonds refunded as they become due at their respective maturities or due at prior redemption dates, as to principal, interest, any prior redemption premium due, and any charges of the escrow agent payable therefrom.

Refunding revenue bonds may be made payable from any revenues derived from the operation of any water facilities or sewerage facilities or of both water facilities and sewerage facilities comprising a joint water and sewer system, notwithstanding that the pledge of any such revenues for the payment of the outstanding bonds issued by the municipality which are to be refunded is thereby modified.

Bonds for refunding and bonds for any other purpose authorized in this part 4 may be issued separately or issued in combination in one series or more.

Except as expressly provided or necessarily implied in this section and in section 31-35-402 (1)(j), the relevant provisions in this part 4 pertaining to revenue bonds not issued for refunding purposes shall be equally applicable in the authorization and issuance of refunding revenue bonds, including their terms and security, the bond ordinance or resolution, rates, fees, tolls, service charges, and other aspects of the bonds; except that the governing body may include, in determining the amount of the refunding bonds, an amount sufficient to pay interest, which is estimated will accrue on the refunding bonds for a period not exceeding five years from the date of the refunding bonds, and the governing body may pay such interest on the refunding bonds from the proceeds of the refunding bonds.

The determination of the governing body that the limitations under this part 4 imposed upon the issuance of refunding bonds have been met shall be conclusive in the absence of fraud or arbitrary and gross abuse of discretion.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1258, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(2) and (6) amended, p. 508, § 4, effective April 22.

L. 89:

(3) amended, p. 1116, § 30, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-412 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-413. Incontestable recital in bonds.

Any ordinance or resolution authorizing or any trust indenture or other instrument appertaining to any bonds under this part 4 may provide that each bond therein authorized shall recite that it is issued under authority of this part 4. Such recital shall conclusively impart full compliance with all of the provisions of this part 4, and all bonds issued containing such recital shall be incontestable for any cause whatsoever after their delivery for value.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1259, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-413 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-414. Application of bond proceeds.

All moneys received from the issuance of any bonds authorized in this part 4 shall be used solely for the purpose for which issued and the cost of any project thereby delineated.

Any accrued interest and any premium shall be applied to the payment of the interest on or the principal of the bonds or both interest and principal or shall be deposited in a reserve therefor, as the governing body may determine.

Any unexpended balance of such bond proceeds remaining after the completion of the acquisition or improvement and equipment of the project or the completion of the purpose for which such bonds were issued shall be paid immediately into the fund created for the payment of the principal of said bonds and shall be used therefor, subject to the provisions as to the times and methods for their payment as stated in the bonds and the proceedings authorizing or otherwise appertaining to their issuance, or into a reserve therefor.

The validity of said bonds shall not be dependent on nor affected by the validity or regularity of any proceedings relating to the acquisition or improvement and equipment of the project or the proper completion of any project for which the bonds are issued.

The purchaser of the bonds shall in no manner be held responsible for the application of the proceeds of the bonds by the municipality or any of its officers, agents, and employees.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1259, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-414 as it existed prior to 1975.